Hawaii statutes.
PART VI. INTERLINEATIONS,
ERASURES, ETC.

Note

Sections 502-61 to 502-64 designated as Part VI and part
heading amended by L 2009, c 102, §2(7).

§502-61 Changes noted in instrument.
Every notary public or the officer authorized to take acknowledgments to
instruments, before taking any acknowledgment, shall first carefully inspect
any instrument proposed to be acknowledged before the notary public or officer,
and ascertain whether there are any interlineations, erasures, or changes in
the instrument. If there are any interlineations, erasures, or changes, the
notary public or officer shall call the attention thereto of the person
offering to acknowledge the instrument. If they are approved, the
acknowledging officer shall place the officer's initials in the margin of the
instrument opposite each interlineation, erasure, or change. The initialing by
the officer taking the acknowledgment is prima facie evidence of the extent of
the interlineations, erasures, or changes and of the fact that the same were
made prior to acknowledgment of the instrument, but does not preclude proof to
the contrary. [L 1896, c 55, §1; RL 1925, §3160; RL 1935, §5146; RL 1945,
§12746; RL 1955, §343-39; am L 1963, c 83, §4; HRS §502-61; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 26 H. 121, 123.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next